Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.630.810

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions of chapter 233, Laws of 1989.

[ 1989 c 233 s 17. Formerly RCW 28A.120.800.]